Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.550

Stay and other temporary remedies.

(1) Unless precluded by law, the agency may grant a stay, in whole or in part, or other temporary remedy.

(2) After a petition for judicial review has been filed, a party may file a motion in the reviewing court seeking a stay or other temporary remedy.

(3) If judicial relief is sought for a stay or other temporary remedy from agency action based on public health, safety, or welfare grounds the court shall not grant such relief unless the court finds that:

(a) The applicant is likely to prevail when the court finally disposes of the matter;

(b) Without relief the applicant will suffer irreparable injury;

(c) The grant of relief to the applicant will not substantially harm other parties to the proceedings; and

(d) The threat to the public health, safety, or welfare is not sufficiently serious to justify the agency action in the circumstances.

(4) If the court determines that relief should be granted from the agency's action granting a stay or other temporary remedies, the court may remand the matter or may enter an order denying a stay or granting a stay on appropriate terms.

[ 1989 c 175 s 25; 1988 c 288 s 511.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.